Hawaii statutes.
§414D-308 Annual report. (a) Each
domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in the State, shall deliver to the department director an annual
report on a form prescribed and furnished by the department director that sets
forth:

(1) The name of the corporation and the jurisdiction
under whose law it is incorporated;

(2) The mailing address of its principal office and
the information required by section 425R-4(a);

(3) The names and addresses of its directors and officers;
and

(4) A brief description of the nature of its
activities.

(b) The annual report shall be filed within
the time periods prescribed in subsections (c) and (d).

(c) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of
this chapter to the contrary, annual reports reflecting the period from January
1, 2002, through December 31, 2002, that would otherwise be required, may be
voluntarily filed with the department director if the annual report complies
with the requirements of this section.

(d) Effective January 1, 2003, for a domestic
or foreign corporation whose date of incorporation or registration in this
State falls between:

(1) January 1 and March 31, an annual report shall be
filed on or before March 31 of each year and shall reflect the state of the
corporation's affairs as of January 1 of the year when filed;

(2) April 1 and June 30, an annual report shall be
filed on or before June 30 of each year and shall reflect the state of the
corporation's affairs as of April 1 of the year when filed;

(3) July 1 and September 30, an annual report shall
be filed on or before September 30 of each year and shall reflect the state of
the corporation's affairs as of July 1 of the year when filed; and

(4) October 1 and December 31, an annual report shall
be filed on or before December 31 of each year and shall reflect the state of
the corporation's affairs as of October 1 of the year when filed;

provided that if a domestic or foreign corporation
is incorporated or registered in the same year in which the annual report is
due, the domestic or foreign corporation shall not be required to file an
annual report for that year. Thereafter, the domestic or foreign corporation
shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(e) If an annual report does not contain the
information required by this section, the department director
shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing
and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to
contain the information required by this section and delivered to the
department director within thirty days after the effective date
of notice, it shall be deemed to have been timely filed. [L 2001, c 105, pt of
§1; am L 2002, c 130, §70; am L 2003, c 124, §41; am L 2004, c 121, §20; am L
2009, c 55, §29]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next